Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 1
MOTOR VEHICLE DEALERS

44-20-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that:

The sale and distribution of motor vehicles affects the public interest, and a significant factor of inducement in making a sale of a motor vehicle is the trust and confidence of the purchaser in the retail dealer from whom the purchase is made and the expectancy that the dealer will remain in business to provide service for the motor vehicle purchased;

Proper motor vehicle service is important to highway safety and the manufacturers and distributors of motor vehicles have an obligation to the public not to terminate or refuse to continue their franchise agreements with retail dealers unless the manufacturer or distributor has first established good cause for termination or noncontinuance of the agreement, to the end that there shall be no diminution of locally available service;

The licensing and supervision of motor vehicle dealers by the motor vehicle dealer board are necessary for the protection of consumers, and therefore, the sale of motor vehicles by unlicensed dealers or salespersons, or by licensed dealers or salespersons who have demonstrated unfitness, should be prevented;

Consumer education concerning the rules of the motor vehicle industry, the considerations when purchasing a motor vehicle, and the role, functions, and actions of the motor vehicle dealer board are necessary for the protection of the public and for maintaining the trust and confidence of the public in the motor vehicle dealer board; and

Subject to the United States constitution and the Colorado constitution, this article 20 applies to each sales, service, and parts agreement in effect, regardless of when the agreement was adopted.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 41, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-101 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-102. Definitions.

As used in this part 1, and in part 4 of this article 20, unless the context or section 44-20-402 otherwise requires:

"Advertise" or "advertisement" means any commercial message in any newspaper, magazine, leaflet, flyer, or catalog, on radio, television, or a public address system, in direct mail literature or other printed material, on any interior or exterior sign or display, in any window display, on a computer display, or in any point-of-transaction literature or price tag that is delivered or made available to a customer or prospective customer in any manner; except that the term does not include materials required to be displayed by federal or state law.

"Board" means the motor vehicle dealer board.

"Business incidental thereto" means a business owned by the motor vehicle dealer or used motor vehicle dealer related to the sale of motor vehicles, including motor vehicle part sales, motor vehicle repair, motor vehicle recycling, motor vehicle security interest assignment, and motor vehicle towing.

"Buyer agent" means any person required to be licensed pursuant to this part 1 who is retained or hired by a consumer for a fee or other thing of value to assist, represent, or act on behalf of the consumer in connection with the purchase or lease of a motor vehicle.

"Buyer agent" does not include a person whose business includes the purchase of motor vehicles primarily for resale or lease; except that nothing in this subsection (4) prohibits a buyer agent from assisting a consumer regarding the disposal of a trade-in motor vehicle that is incident to the purchase or lease of a vehicle if the buyer agent does not advertise the sale of, or sell, the vehicle to the general public, directs interested dealers and wholesalers to communicate their offers directly to the consumer or to the consumer via the buyer agent, does not handle or transfer titles or funds between the consumer and the purchaser, receives no compensation from a dealer or wholesaler purchasing a consumer's vehicle, and identifies himself or herself as a buyer agent to dealers and wholesalers interested in the consumer's vehicle.

A "buyer agent" licensed under this part 1 shall not be employed by or receive a fee from a person whose business includes the purchase of motor vehicles primarily for resale or lease, a motor vehicle manufacturer, a motor vehicle dealer, or a used motor vehicle dealer.

"Coerce" means to compel or attempt to compel by threatening, retaliating, or exerting economic force or by not performing or complying with any terms or provisions of the franchise or agreement; except that recommendation, exposition, persuasion, urging, or argument do not constitute coercion.

"Consumer" means a purchaser or lessee of a motor vehicle used for business, personal, family, or household purposes. "Consumer" does not include a purchaser of motor vehicles primarily for resale.

"Custom trailer" means any motor vehicle that is not driven or propelled by its own power and is designed to be attached to, become a part of, or be drawn by a motor vehicle and that is uniquely designed and manufactured for a specific purpose or customer.

"Custom trailer" does not include manufactured housing, farm tractors, and other machines and tools used in the production, harvest, and care of farm products.

"Director" means the director of the auto industry division created in section 44-20-105.

"Distributor" means a person, resident or nonresident, who, in whole or in part, sells or distributes new motor vehicles to motor vehicle dealers or who maintains distributor representatives.

"Fire truck" means a vehicle intended for use in the extermination of fires, with features that may include a fire pump, a water tank, an aerial ladder, an elevated platform, or any combination thereof.

"Franchise" means the authority to sell or service and repair motor vehicles of a designated line-make granted through a sales, service, and parts agreement with a manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative.

"Good faith" means the duty of each party to any franchise and all officers, employees, or agents thereof to act in a fair and equitable manner toward each other so as to guarantee the one party freedom from coercion, intimidation, or threats of coercion or intimidation from the other party. Recommendation, endorsement, exposition, persuasion, urging, or argument shall not be deemed to constitute a lack of good faith.

"Line-make" means a group or series of motor vehicles that have the same brand identification or brand name, based upon the manufacturer's trademark, trade name, or logo.

"Manufacturer" means any person, firm, association, corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, who manufactures or assembles new and unused motor vehicles; except that "manufacturer" does not include:

A person who only manufactures utility trailers that weigh less than two thousand pounds and does not manufacture any other type of motor vehicle; and

A person, other than a manufacturer operating a motor vehicle dealer in accordance with section 44-20-126, who is a licensed dealer selling motor vehicles that the person has manufactured.

"Manufacturer representative" means a representative employed by a person who manufactures or assembles motor vehicles for the purpose of making or promoting the sale of its motor vehicles or for supervising or contacting its dealers or prospective dealers.

"Motor vehicle" means every vehicle intended primarily for use on the public highways that is self-propelled and every vehicle intended primarily for operation on the public highways that is not self-propelled but is designed to be attached to, become a part of, or be drawn by a self-propelled vehicle, not including farm tractors and other machines and tools used in the production, harvesting, and care of farm products. "Motor vehicle" includes a low-power scooter or autocycle as either is defined in section 42-1-102.

"Motor vehicle auctioneer" means any person, not otherwise required to be licensed pursuant to this part 1, who is engaged in the business of offering to sell, or selling, used motor vehicles owned by persons other than the auctioneer at public auction only. Any auctioning of motor vehicles by an auctioneer must be incidental to the primary business of auctioning goods.

"Motor vehicle dealer" means a person who, for commission or with intent to make a profit or gain of money or other thing of value, sells, leases, exchanges, rents with option to purchase, offers, or attempts to negotiate a sale, lease, or exchange of an interest in new or new and used motor vehicles or who is engaged wholly or in part in the business of selling or leasing new or new and used motor vehicles, whether or not the motor vehicles are owned by the person. The sale or lease of three or more new or new and used motor vehicles or the offering for sale or lease of more than three new or new and used motor vehicles at the same address or telephone number in any one calendar year is prima facie evidence that a person is engaged in the business of selling or leasing new or new and used motor vehicles. "Motor vehicle dealer" includes an owner of real property who allows more than three new or new and used motor vehicles to be offered for sale or lease on the property during one calendar year unless the property is leased to a licensed motor vehicle dealer. "Motor vehicle dealer" does not include:

Receivers, trustees, administrators, executors, guardians, or other persons appointed by or acting under the judgment or order of any court;

Public officers while performing their official duties;

Employees of a motor vehicle dealer when engaged in the specific performance of their duties as employees;

A wholesaler or anyone selling motor vehicles solely to wholesalers;

Any person engaged in the selling of a fire truck; or

A motor vehicle auctioneer.

"Motor vehicle salesperson" means a natural person who, for a salary, commission, or compensation of any kind, is employed either directly or indirectly, regularly or occasionally, by a motor vehicle dealer or used motor vehicle dealer to sell, lease, purchase, or exchange or to negotiate for the sale, lease, purchase, or exchange of motor vehicles.

"New motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle that has been transferred on a manufacturer's statement of origin and that has sufficiently low mileage to be considered new, as determined by the board.

"Person" means any natural person, estate, trust, limited liability company, partnership, association, corporation, or other legal entity, including a registered limited liability partnership.

"Principal place of business" means a site or location devoted exclusively to the business for which the motor vehicle dealer or used motor vehicle dealer is licensed, and businesses incidental thereto, sufficiently designated to admit of definite description, with adequate contiguous space to permit the display of one or more new or used motor vehicles, with a permanent enclosed building or structure large enough to accommodate the office of the dealer and to provide a safe place to keep the books and other records of the business of the dealer, at which site or location the principal portion of the dealer's business shall be conducted and the books and records thereof kept and maintained; except that a dealer may keep its books and records at an off-site location in Colorado after notifying the board in writing of the location at least thirty days in advance.

"Recreational vehicle" means a camping trailer, fifth wheel trailer, motor home, recreational park trailer, travel trailer, or truck camper, all as defined in section 24-32-902, or multipurpose trailer, as defined in section 42-1-102.

"Sales, service, and parts agreement" means an agreement between a manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative and a motor vehicle or powersports dealer authorizing the dealer to sell and service a line-make of motor or powersports vehicles or imposing any duty on the dealer in consideration for the right to have or competitively operate a franchise, including any amendments or additional related agreements thereto. Each amendment, modification, or addendum that materially affects the rights, responsibilities, or obligations of the contracting parties creates a new sales, service, and parts agreement.

"Site control provision" means an agreement that applies to real property owned or leased by a franchisee and that gives a motor vehicle or powersports vehicle manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative the right to:

Control the use and development of the real property;

Require the franchisee to establish or maintain an exclusive dealership facility at the real property; or

Restrict the franchisee from transferring, selling, leasing, developing, or changing the use of the real property.

"Used motor vehicle dealer" means a person who, for commission or with intent to make a profit or gain of money or other thing of value, sells, exchanges, leases, or offers an interest in used motor vehicles, or attempts to negotiate a sale, exchange, or lease of used motor vehicles, or who is engaged wholly or in part in the business of selling used motor vehicles, whether or not the motor vehicles are owned by the person. The sale of three or more used motor vehicles or the offering for sale of more than three used motor vehicles at the same address or telephone number in any one calendar year is prima facie evidence that a person is engaged in the business of selling used motor vehicles. "Used motor vehicle dealer" includes an owner of real property who allows more than three used motor vehicles to be offered for sale on the property during one calendar year unless the property is leased to a licensed used motor vehicle dealer. "Used motor vehicle dealer" does not include:

Receivers, trustees, administrators, executors, guardians, or other persons appointed by or acting under the judgment or order of any court;

Public officers while performing their official duties;

Employees of a used motor vehicle dealer when engaged in the specific performance of their duties as employees;

A wholesaler or anyone selling motor vehicles solely to wholesalers;

Mortgagees or secured parties as to sales in any one year of not more than twelve motor vehicles constituting collateral on a mortgage or security agreement, if the mortgagees or secured parties do not realize for their own account any money in excess of the outstanding balance secured by the mortgage or security agreement, plus costs of collection;

A person who only sells or exchanges no more than four motor vehicles that are collector's items under part 3 or 4 of article 12 of title 42;

A motor vehicle auctioneer; or

An operator, as defined in section 42-4-2102 (5), who sells a motor vehicle pursuant to section 42-4-2104.

"Wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer" means a person or firm that provides auction services in wholesale transactions in which the purchasers are motor vehicle dealers licensed by this state or any other jurisdiction or in consumer transactions of government vehicles at a time and place that does not conflict with a wholesale motor vehicle auction conducted by that licensee.

"Wholesaler" means a person who, for commission or with intent to make a profit or gain of money or other thing of value, sells, exchanges, or offers or attempts to negotiate a sale, lease, or exchange of an interest in new or new and used motor vehicles solely to motor vehicle dealers or used motor vehicle dealers.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 42, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-102 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-103. Motor vehicle dealer board - creation.

There is hereby created and established the motor vehicle dealer board, consisting of nine members who have been residents of this state for at least five years, three of whom shall be licensed motor vehicle dealers, three of whom shall be licensed used motor vehicle dealers, and three of whom shall be members from the public at large. The members representing the public at large shall not have a present or past financial interest in a motor vehicle dealership. The terms of office of the board members shall be three years. Any vacancies shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term.

All board members shall be appointed by the governor.

Each board member shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred while engaged in the discharge of official duties.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 47, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-103 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-104. Board - oath - meetings - powers and duties - rules.

Each member of the board, before entering on the discharge of the member's duties and within thirty days after the effective date of the member's appointment, shall subscribe an oath for the faithful performance of the member's duties before any officer authorized to administer oaths in this state and shall file the same with the secretary of state.

The board shall annually in the month of July elect from the membership thereof a president, a first vice-president, and a second vice-president. The board shall meet at such times as it deems necessary. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum at any meeting or hearing.

The board is authorized and empowered:

To promulgate, amend, and repeal rules reasonably necessary to implement this part 1, including the administration, enforcement, issuance, and denial of licenses to motor vehicle dealers, motor vehicle salespersons, used motor vehicle dealers, wholesale motor vehicle auction dealers, business disposers, and wholesalers, and the laws of the state of Colorado;

To delegate to the board's executive secretary, employed pursuant to section 44-20-105 (2)(b), the authority to execute all actions within the power of the board, carry out the directives of the board, and make recommendations to the board on all matters within the authority of the board;

To issue through the department a temporary license to any person applying for any license issued by the board. The temporary license shall permit the applicant to operate for a period not to exceed one hundred twenty days while the board is completing its investigation and determination of all facts relative to the qualifications of the applicant for the license. A temporary license is terminated when the applicant's license is issued or denied.

To issue through the department and, for reasonable cause shown or upon satisfactory proof of the unfitness of the applicant under standards established and set forth in this part 1, to refuse to issue to any applicant any license the board is authorized to issue by this part 1;

To permit the executive director or the director to issue licenses pursuant to rules adopted by the board pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section;

After due notice and a hearing, to review the findings of an administrative law judge or a hearing officer from a hearing conducted pursuant to this part 1 to revoke and suspend or to order the director to issue or to reinstate, on such terms and conditions and for such period of time as to the board appear fair and just, any license issued under this part 1. The board may direct a letter of admonition for minor violations or may issue a letter of reprimand to any licensee for a violation of this part 1. A letter of admonition does not become a part of the licensee's record with the board. A letter of reprimand is a part of the licensee's record with the board for a period of two years after issuance and may be considered in aggravation of any subsequent violation by the licensee. When a letter of reprimand is sent to a licensee of the board, the licensee shall be notified in writing regarding the right to request in writing, within twenty days after receipt of the letter, that formal disciplinary proceedings be initiated against the licensee to adjudicate the propriety of the conduct upon which the letter of reprimand is based. If a request is made within the twenty-day period, the letter of reprimand is deemed vacated and the matter shall be processed by means of formal disciplinary proceedings.

The findings of the board pursuant to subsection (3)(e)(I) of this section shall be final.

To investigate through the director, on its own motion or upon the written and signed complaint of any person, any suspected or alleged violation by a motor vehicle dealer, motor vehicle salesperson, used motor vehicle dealer, wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer, business disposer, or wholesaler of any of the terms and provisions of this part 1 or of any rule promulgated by the board under the authority conferred upon it in this section. The board shall order an investigation of all written and signed complaints, may issue subpoenas, and may delegate the authority to issue subpoenas to the director, and the director shall make an investigation of all complaints transmitted by the board pursuant to section 44-20-105 (3). The board may seek to resolve disputes before beginning an investigation or hearing through its own action or by direction to the director.

After an investigation by the director or the director's designee, if the board determines that there is probable cause to believe a violation of this article 20 has occurred, it may order that an administrative hearing be held pursuant to section 24-4-105.

To summarily issue cease-and-desist orders on such terms and conditions and for such period of time as to the board appears fair and just to any person who is licensed by the board pursuant to this part 1 if the orders are followed by notice and a hearing pursuant to section 44-20-122;

To prescribe the forms to be used for applications for motor vehicle dealers', motor vehicle salespersons', used motor vehicle dealers', wholesale motor vehicle auction dealers', business disposal, and wholesalers' licenses to be issued and to require of the applicants, as a condition precedent to the issuance of the licenses, such information concerning their fitness to be licensed under this part 1 as it may consider necessary. Every application for a motor vehicle dealer's license or used motor vehicle dealer's license must contain, in addition to such information as the board may require, a statement of the following facts:

The name and residence address of the applicant and the trade name, if any, under which the applicant intends to conduct the applicant's business and, if the applicant is a copartnership, the name and residence address of each member thereof, whether a limited or general partner, and the name under which the partnership business is to be conducted and, if the applicant is a corporation, the name of the corporation and the name and address of each of its principal officers and directors;

A complete description, including the city, town, or village; the street and number, if any, of the principal place of business; and such other and additional places of business as shall be operated and maintained by the applicant in conjunction with the principal place of business;

If the application is for a motor vehicle dealer's license, the names of the new motor vehicles that the applicant has been enfranchised to sell or exchange and the name and address of the manufacturer or distributor who has enfranchised the applicant;

The names and addresses of the persons who shall act as salespersons under the authority of the license, if issued.

To adopt a seal with the words "motor vehicle dealer board" and such other devices as the board may desire engraved thereon by which it shall authenticate the acts of its office;

To require that a motor vehicle dealer's or used motor vehicle dealer's principal place of business and such other sites or locations as may be operated and maintained by the dealers in conjunction with their principal place of business have erected or posted thereon the signs or devices providing information relating to the dealer's name, the location and address of the dealer's principal place of business, the type of license held by the dealer, and the number thereof, as the board shall consider necessary to enable any person doing business with the dealer to identify the dealer properly, and for this purpose to determine the size and shape of the signs or devices, the lettering thereon, and other details thereof and to prescribe rules for the location thereof;

To conduct or cause to be conducted written examinations as prescribed by the board testing the competency of all first-time applicants for a motor vehicle dealer's license, motor vehicle salesperson's license, used motor vehicle dealer's license, wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer's license, or wholesaler's license;

To prescribe a form or forms to be used as a part of a contract for the sale of a motor vehicle by any motor vehicle dealer, business disposer, or motor vehicle salesperson, other than a retail installment sales contract subject to the provisions of the "Uniform Consumer Credit Code", articles 1 to 9 of title 5, which shall include the following information in addition to any other disclosures or information required by state or federal law:

In twelve-point bold-faced type or a size at least three points larger than the smallest type appearing in the contract, an instruction that the form is a legal instrument and that, if the purchaser of the motor vehicle does not understand the form, the purchaser should seek legal assistance;

In bold-faced type, of the size specified in subsection (3)(l)(I)(A) of this section, an instruction that only those terms in written form embody the contract for sale of a motor vehicle and that any conflicting oral representations made to the purchaser are void;

In bold-faced type, of the size specified in subsection (3)(l)(I)(A) of this section, a notice that fraud or misrepresentation in the sale of a motor vehicle is punishable under the laws of this state;

In bold-faced type, of the size specified in subsection (3)(l)(I)(A) of this section, if the contract for the sale of a motor vehicle requires a single lump sum payment of the purchase price, a clear disclosure to the purchaser of that fact or, if the contract is contingent upon the approval of credit financing for the purchaser arranged by or through the motor vehicle dealer, in bold-faced type, a statement that the purchaser shall agree to purchase the motor vehicle that is the subject of the sale from the motor vehicle dealer at not greater than a certain annual percentage rate of financing, which annual percentage rate of financing shall be agreed upon by the parties and entered in writing on the contract;

Except as otherwise provided under part 1 of article 1 of title 6, where the purchase price of the motor vehicle is not paid to the motor vehicle dealer in full at the time of consummation of the sale and the purchaser and motor vehicle dealer elect that the motor vehicle dealer shall deliver and the purchaser shall take possession of the motor vehicle at such time, in bold-faced type, a statement that in the event financing cannot be arranged in accordance with the provisions stated in the contract, and the sale is not consummated, the purchaser shall agree to pay a daily rate and a mileage rate for use of the motor vehicle until such time as financing of the purchase price of the motor vehicle is arranged for the obligor by or through the authorized motor vehicle dealer or until the purchase price is paid to the authorized motor vehicle dealer in full by or through the obligor, which daily rate and mileage rate shall be specified and agreed upon by the parties and entered in writing on the contract.

The information required by subsection (3)(l)(I) of this section shall be read and initialed by both parties at the time of the consummation of the sale of a motor vehicle.

The use of the contract form required by subsection (3)(l)(I) of this section shall be mandatory for the sale of any motor vehicle.

The board may require a licensee to include with a consumer sales contract a written notice that provides to the consumer the contact information of the board and information about the board's authority over consumer motor vehicle sales.

After final action is taken on a hearing held before an administrative law judge or a hearing officer, to review the findings of law and fact and the fairness of any fine imposed and to uphold the fine, to impose an administrative fine upon its own initiative, not to exceed ten thousand dollars for each offense by any licensee, or to vacate the fine imposed by the judge or hearing officer; except that, for motor vehicle dealers who sell primarily motor vehicles that weigh under one thousand five hundred pounds, the fine for each offense must not exceed one thousand dollars. Whenever a hearing is heard by an administrative law judge, the maximum fine that may be imposed is ten thousand dollars for each offense by any person licensed by the board under this part 1; except that, for motor vehicle dealers who sell primarily vehicles that weigh under one thousand five hundred pounds, the fine for each offense must not exceed one thousand dollars. Whenever a licensing hearing is conducted by a hearing officer, the sanctions that may be recommended by the hearing officer are limited to the denial or grant of an unrestricted license or a restricted license under such terms as the hearing officer deems appropriate. Whenever a disciplinary hearing is conducted by a hearing officer, the hearing officer may only recommend a probationary period of no more than twelve months, a fine of no more than five hundred dollars, or both a probationary period and fine for each violation committed by a person licensed by the board.
(m) (I) (A) After final action is taken on a hearing held before an administrative law judge or a hearing officer, to review the findings of law and fact and the fairness of any fine imposed and to uphold the fine, to impose an administrative fine upon its own initiative, not to exceed ten thousand dollars for each offense by any licensee, or to vacate the fine imposed by the judge or hearing officer; except that, for motor vehicle dealers who sell primarily motor vehicles that weigh under one thousand five hundred pounds, the fine for each offense must not exceed one thousand dollars. Whenever a hearing is heard by an administrative law judge, the maximum fine that may be imposed is ten thousand dollars for each offense by any person licensed by the board under this part 1; except that, for motor vehicle dealers who sell primarily vehicles that weigh under one thousand five hundred pounds, the fine for each offense must not exceed one thousand dollars. Whenever a licensing hearing is conducted by a hearing officer, the sanctions that may be recommended by the hearing officer are limited to the denial or grant of an unrestricted license or a restricted license under such terms as the hearing officer deems appropriate. Whenever a disciplinary hearing is conducted by a hearing officer, the hearing officer may only recommend a probationary period of no more than twelve months, a fine of no more than five hundred dollars, or both a probationary period and fine for each violation committed by a person licensed by the board.

The board shall promulgate rules regarding circumstances in which a board member should not act as a hearing officer in a particular matter before the board because of business competition issues connected with the parties involved in the matter.

The findings of the board pursuant to subsection (3)(m)(I) of this section shall be final.

To impose a fine of up to one thousand dollars per day per violation for any person found, after notice and hearing pursuant to section 24-4-105, to have violated the provisions of section 44-20-124 (2). For the purposes of this subsection (3)(n), the address for the notice to be given under section 24-4-105 is the last-known address for the person as indicated in the state motor vehicle records; the last-known address for the owner of the real property upon which motor vehicles are displayed in violation of section 44-20-124 (2) as indicated in the records of the county assessor's office; or an address for service of process in accordance with rule 4 of the Colorado rules of civil procedure.

Any person who fails to pay a fine ordered by the board for a violation of section 44-20-124 (2) under this subsection (3)(n) shall be subject to enforcement proceedings, by the board through the attorney general, in the county or district court pursuant to the Colorado rules of civil procedure. Any fines collected under the provisions of this subsection (3)(n) shall be disposed of pursuant to section 44-20-133.

The board shall promulgate rules by January 1, 2008, establishing enforcement and compliance standards to ensure that administrative penalties are equitably assessed and commensurate with the seriousness of the violation.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 47, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(3)(a), (3)(f)(I), IP(3)(h), and IP(3)(l)(I) amended, (SB 19-249), ch. 309, p. 2801, § 1, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-104 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-105. Auto industry division - creation - powers and duties of executive director and director.

There is created in the department the auto industry division, the head of which is the director of the division. The director is appointed by the executive director and serves at the pleasure of the executive director. The division is a type 2 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercises its powers and performs its duties and functions under the department.

The executive director is hereby charged with the administration, enforcement, and issuance or denial of the licensing of buyer agents, distributors, manufacturer representatives, and manufacturers, and has the following powers and duties:

To promulgate, amend, and repeal reasonable rules relating to those functions the executive director is mandated to carry out pursuant to this part 1 and the laws of the state of Colorado that the executive director deems necessary to implement this part 1;

To employ, subject to the laws of the state of Colorado and after consultation with the board, an executive secretary for the board, who is accountable to the board and shall, pursuant to delegation by the board, discharge the responsibilities of the board under this part 1;

To issue and, for reasonable cause shown or upon satisfactory proof of the unfitness of the applicant under standards established and set forth in this part 1, to refuse to issue to any applicant any license the executive director is authorized to issue by this part 1;

To prescribe the forms to be used for applications for licenses to be issued by the executive director under this part 1 and to require of the applicants, as a condition precedent to the issuance of the licenses, such information concerning the applicant's fitness to be licensed under this part 1 as the executive director considers necessary;

To summarily issue cease-and-desist orders on such terms and conditions and for such period of time as to the executive director appears fair and just to any person who is licensed by the executive director pursuant to this part 1 if the orders are followed by notice and a hearing pursuant to section 44-20-104 (3)(e)(I);

To issue cease-and-desist orders to persons acting as manufacturers without the manufacturer's license required by this part 1; and

To impose a fine, not to exceed one thousand dollars per day, for each violation of section 44-20-124 (1) after a notice and hearing subject to section 24-4-105.

The director may:

(I) Employ such clerks, deputies, and assistants as the director considers necessary to discharge the duties imposed upon the director or executive director by this part 1 and to designate the duties of the clerks, deputies, and assistants;

(II) Investigate, upon the director's own initiative, upon the written and signed complaint of any person, or upon request by the board under section 44-20-104 (3)(f)(I), any suspected or alleged violation by a person licensed under this part 1 or of any rule promulgated under this article 20.

The investigators and their supervisors utilized by the director, while actually engaged in performing their duties, have the authority as delegated by the director to issue subpoenas in relation to performance of their duties enforcing this part 1 and the authority as delegated by the director to issue summonses for violations of sections 44-20-124 (2) and 42-6-142, to issue misdemeanor summonses for violations of section 44-20-123 (1)(a), and to procure criminal records during an investigation.

If any person fails to comply with a cease-and-desist order issued pursuant to this section, the executive director may bring a suit for injunction to prevent any further and continued violation of the order. In any such suit, the final proceedings of the executive director, based upon evidence in record, are prima facie evidence of the facts found therein.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 52, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3362, § 34, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-105 as it existed prior to 2018.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

44-20-106. Records as evidence.

Copies of all records and papers in the office of the board, director, or executive director, duly authenticated under the hand and seal of the board, director, or executive director, shall be received in evidence in all cases equally and with like effect as the original thereof.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 54, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-106 as it existed prior to 2018.

Cross references:

For the provision in the Colorado rules of evidence concerning the admission of copies of public records, see C.R.E. 1005.

44-20-107. Attorney general to advise and represent.

The attorney general of this state shall represent the board, director, and executive director and shall give opinions on all questions of law relating to the interpretation of this part 1 or arising out of the administration thereof and shall appear for and in behalf of the board, director, and executive director in all actions brought by or against them, whether under this part 1 or otherwise.

The board may request the attorney general to make civil investigations and enforce rules of the board in cases of civil violations and to bring and defend civil suits and proceedings for any of the purposes necessary and proper for carrying out the functions of the board.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 54, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-107 as it existed prior to 2018.